Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-722
Board meetings; notice; waiver.

Meetings of the board, regular or special, shall be held at such place and upon such notice as the bylaws may prescribe. Attendance of a director or alternate director at any meeting shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except where a director or alternate director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the board of directors need be specified in the notice or waiver of notice of such meeting.

Laws 1937, c. 50, § 22, p. 209;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-822;

R.S.1943, § 70-722;

Laws 1974, LB 833, § 4.